Georgia, session 2025_26, SB42.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 16-6-13 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to penalties for
violating Code Sections 16-6-9 through 16-6-12, is amended by repealing and reserving the
entirety of subsection (b).
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
S. B. 42
- 1 -

LC 48 1398
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 42
- 2 -